Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1490
Rent increase; written notice.

Each tenant shall be notified in writing of any rent increase by actual notice or by United States mail at least sixty days prior to the effective date of the increase.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 41.